Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1381.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "delinquent child" in section 6302 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Delinquent child." A child [ten] 13 years of age or older whom the court has found to have committed a delinquent act and is in need of treatment, supervision or rehabilitation.* * *Section 2. This act shall apply to proceedings that commence 123456789101112131415161718 or transfers that occur on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1381PN2029 - 2 - 123